Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.050

Violations—Civil penalties.

(1) A manufacturer, wholesale dealer, agent, or any other person or entity who knowingly sells or offers to sell cigarettes, other than through retail sale, in violation of RCW 19.305.020, for a first offense is liable to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars per each sale of the cigarettes, and for a subsequent offense is liable to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per each sale of the cigarettes. However, in no case may the penalty against such a person or entity exceed one hundred thousand dollars during any thirty-day period.

(2)(a) A retail dealer who knowingly sells cigarettes in violation of RCW 19.305.020 is:

(i) For a first offense liable to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars, and for a subsequent offense is liable to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars, per each sale or offer for sale of cigarettes, if the total number of cigarettes sold or offered for sale does not exceed one thousand cigarettes; or

(ii) For a first offense liable to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars, and for a subsequent offense is liable to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars, per each sale or offer for sale of cigarettes, if the total number of cigarettes sold or offered for sale exceeds one thousand cigarettes.

(b) A penalty under this subsection may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars during a thirty-day period.

(3) In addition to any penalty prescribed by law, any corporation, partnership, sole proprietor, limited partnership, or association engaged in the manufacture of cigarettes that knowingly makes a false certification under RCW 19.305.030 is, for a first offense, liable to a civil penalty of at least seventy-five thousand dollars, and for a subsequent offense a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each false certification.

(4) Any person violating any other provision in this chapter is liable to a civil penalty for a first offense not to exceed one thousand dollars, and for a subsequent offense is liable to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars, for each violation.

(5) Any cigarettes that have been sold or offered for sale that do not comply with the performance standard required by RCW 19.305.020 are subject to forfeiture under RCW 82.24.130. However, prior to the destruction of any cigarette seized under this subsection, the true holder of the trademark rights in the cigarette brand must be permitted to inspect the cigarette.

(6) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the state director of fire protection or attorney general may initiate an appropriate civil action in superior court for a violation of this chapter, including petitioning for injunctive relief or to recover any costs or damages suffered by the state because of a violation of this chapter, including enforcement costs relating to the specific violation and attorneys' fees. Each violation of this chapter or of rules adopted under this chapter constitutes a separate civil violation for which the state director of fire protection or attorney general may obtain relief.

[ 2008 c 239 s 5.]